Washington statutes.
RCW 6.44.020

Scope.

(1) This chapter applies only to a foreign-money claim in an action or distribution proceeding.

(2) This chapter applies to foreign-money issues even if other law under the conflict of laws rules of this state applies to other issues in the action or distribution proceeding.

[ 1991 c 153 s 2.]